Maine, session 132, LD1178.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4307, sub-§5, as corrected by RR 2009, c. 2, §59, is amended
to read:
5. Disputes between municipalities. Nothing in this This section may not permit a
municipality to deny assistance to an otherwise eligible applicant when there is any dispute
regarding residency. In cases of dispute regarding which municipality is the municipality
of responsibility, the municipality where the application has been filed shall provide
support until responsibility has been determined by the department. The municipality filing
the dispute must be reimbursed for the general assistance for the person who was moved
within 10 days of filing. The department shall make a written determination within 30 15
working days of a complaint or notification of a dispute. The department's decision must
include the sources of information relied upon, findings of fact and conclusions of law
regarding which municipality is responsible and the reimbursement due, if any, from the
responsible municipality to the municipality providing assistance. The department shall
immediately notify both municipalities in dispute after the department's decision is made.
If after 30 within 15 days after notice by the department the reimbursement has not been
paid, the municipality to which reimbursement is due shall notify the department, the
department shall credit the municipality owed the reimbursement and either deduct that
amount from the debtor municipality or and refer the bill to the Treasurer of State for
payment from any taxes, revenue, fines or fees due from the State to the municipality. A
reimbursement amount outstanding after 15 days accrues interest at a rate of 6% per annum
on the amount owed by the debtor municipality until the amount is fully paid. A
municipality found in violation of subsection 1 more than once within a 12-month period
is subject to a penalty of up to $10,000, enforceable by the Attorney General, and must
undergo a compliance audit by the department, the expense of which must be paid by the
municipality.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4307, sub-§5-A is enacted to read:
5-A. Rebuttable presumption. If a person is moved from one municipality to another
in apparent violation of this section, there is a rebuttable presumption that the municipality
that moved the person is in violation of this section.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §4307, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 349, Pt. H, §15, is
amended to read:
6. Appeals. Any municipality or person who is aggrieved by any decision or action
made by the department pursuant to this section shall have has the right to appeal pursuant
to the Maine Administrative Procedure Act, Title 5, chapter 375. A request for that appeal
shall must be in writing and shall must be made within 30 days of the written department
decision. The appeal shall must be held within 30 15 days of receipt of that request and
shall must be conducted by one or more fair hearing officers. In no event may an An appeal
may not be held before a person or body responsible for the decision or action. Review of
any decision under this subsection shall must be pursuant to the Maine Rules of Civil
Procedure, Rule 80C.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §4307, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Report. Beginning January 1, 2026, the department shall publish an annual report
listing all municipalities found in violation of this section for the preceding year, the
Page 1 - 132LR1468(01)

415 number of violations, amounts reimbursed and enforcement actions taken under this
426 section. The department shall make the report publicly available and submit the report to
437 the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over municipal matters.